Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-360
Department of Revenue; created; Tax Commissioner; chief executive officer.

There is hereby created and established a department of state government to be known as the Department of Revenue, of which the chief executive officer shall be the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1969, c. 630, § 1, p. 2532;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 77-340;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 1.